Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [256K.50] EMERGENCY SHELTER FACILITIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of human services. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible applicant" means a Tribal government, not-for-profit corporation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, statutory or home rule charter city, county, or housing and redevelopment authority established under section 469.003. new text end new text begin (d) "Emergency shelter facility" means a facility that provides a safe, sanitary, accessible, and suitable emergency shelter for individuals and families experiencing homelessness, regardless of whether the facility provides emergency shelter during the day, overnight, or both. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Creation of accounts. new text end new text begin Two emergency shelter facility accounts are created. One account is created in the general fund and one account is created in the bond proceeds fund. Money in the accounts is appropriated to the commissioner to make grants under this section. Money in the accounts is available until encumbered or spent subject to section 16A.642. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Project criteria. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall prioritize grants under this section for projects that improve or expand emergency shelter facility options by: new text end new text begin (1) adding additional emergency shelter facilities by renovating existing facilities not currently operating as emergency shelter facilities; new text end new text begin (2) adding additional emergency shelter facility beds by renovating existing emergency shelter facilities, including major projects that address an accumulation of deferred maintenance or repair or replacement of mechanical, electrical, and safety systems and components in danger of failure; new text end new text begin (3) adding additional emergency shelter facility beds through acquisition and construction of new emergency shelter facilities; and new text end new text begin (4) improving the safety, sanitation, accessibility, and habitability of existing emergency shelter facilities, including major projects that address an accumulation of deferred maintenance or repair or replacement of mechanical, electrical, and safety systems and components in danger of failure. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligible uses of grant money. new text end new text begin A grant under this section may be used to pay for 100 percent of total project capital expenditures or a specified project phase, up to $1,000,000 per project. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin State and local building codes met. new text end new text begin All projects funded with a grant under this section must meet all applicable state and local building codes at the time of project completion. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Lease or management agreements. new text end new text begin An eligible applicant may enter into a lease or management agreement for operation of the emergency shelter facility, subject to section 16A.695. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Competitive request for proposal process; priority. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must use a competitive request for proposal process to identify potential projects and eligible applicants on a statewide basis. At least 40 percent of the appropriation for this purpose must be awarded to projects located in greater Minnesota. If the commissioner does not receive sufficient eligible funding requests from greater Minnesota to award at least 40 percent of the appropriation for this purpose to projects in greater Minnesota, the commissioner may award the remaining money to other eligible projects. new text end new text begin (b) For eligible applicants seeking funding under this section for the acquisition and construction of new emergency shelter facilities under subdivision 3, clause (3), the commissioner must give priority to projects in which the eligible applicant will provide at least ten percent of total project funding. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Eligible projects. new text end new text begin (a) The proceeds of state general obligation bonds may only be expended for grants to statutory or home rule charter cities, counties, or housing and redevelopment authorities established under section 469.003. new text end new text begin (b) Appropriations from the general fund may be expended for grants to Tribal governments, not-for-profit corporations under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, statutory or home rule charter cities, counties, or housing and redevelopment authorities established under section 469.003. new text end